District of Columbia statutes.
44-709

Mayor to visit, investigate and report on certain charitable institutions.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is required to visit and investigate the management of all institutions of charity within the District which may be appropriated for out of the District revenues, in whole or in part, and shall require an itemized report of receipts and expenditures to be made to him, to be transmitted with his annual report to Congress, which report shall also include such recommendations as the Mayor may deem proper concerning the necessity for such institutions, together with a plan for their organization and management, and estimates of appropriations necessary for their maintenance.

July 5, 1884, 23 Stat. 127, ch. 227, § 1
Public welfare supervision, board of public welfare, institutions supported by congressional appropriations, see § 4-111.
1981 Ed., § 32-1201.
1973 Ed., § 32-1001.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.